Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202566-302
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; state plan for regulating carbon dioxide emissions; duties.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall not submit a state plan for regulating carbon dioxide emissions from covered electric generating units to the United States Environmental Protection Agency until the department has prepared a report as required in section 66-303. Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from complying with federally prescribed deadlines.

Laws 2015, LB469, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 72;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 357.